Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 5. Mobile Homes

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d Mobile Homes and Trailer Parks § 1 et seq.

Validity, construction, and application of mobile home eviction statutes, 43 ALR5th 705.

§ 31-2-501.
Definitions; application required.

As used in this act:

The definitions in W.S.

31-1-101

apply;

“Mobile home” means a transportable home defined in W.S.

31-1-101

(a)(xxiv)(C);

“Mobile home dealer” means as defined in W.S. 35-18-102(a)(v) but includes a finance agency as defined in W.S. 34.1-2-104;

“This act” means W.S.

31-2-501

through

31-2-508

.

Except as provided by W.S.

31-2-502

, any owner of a mobile home located in this state for which no Wyoming certificate of title has been issued to the owner, or the transferee upon transfer of ownership of a mobile home, shall apply for a certificate of title at the office of a county clerk within forty-five (45) days of the date the mobile home became subject to this act, or upon a transfer, within forty-five (45) days of the date of transfer.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1; 2015 ch. 31, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, in (b), substituted “sixty (60) days” for “forty-five (45) days.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “any” for “every” in (b).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What is “temporary” building or structure within meaning of restrictive covenant, 49 ALR4th 1018.

§ 31-2-502.
Exclusions.

No certificate of title shall be issued or required for mobile homes:

Owned by the United States;

Being transported from a point outside this state;

Held for sale by a Wyoming mobile home dealer;

Installed on a permanent foundation, taxable as real property and which has no current title under this act.

If a mobile home is installed on a permanent foundation and is taxable as real property:

The certificate of title or manufacturer’s certificate of origin, if any, shall be surrendered to and cancelled by the county clerk of the county in which the mobile home is located except that no title shall be cancelled under this subsection unless all liens on the home have been released. The county clerk may require the person surrendering the title for cancellation to disclose information necessary to determine whether cancellation is proper under law. The county clerk shall issue a document certifying the cancellation of the certificate of title for recording in the real estate records of the county clerk of the county in which the mobile home is located;

If the certificate of title or manufacturer’s certificate of origin is unavailable then upon filing with the county clerk a sworn affidavit in accordance with this paragraph and an acknowledgment if required by subsection (c) of this section, the clerk shall issue a title for the purpose of immediate surrender to and cancellation by the county clerk. The affidavit required under this paragraph shall be on a form prescribed by the department. The affiant shall attest to the unavailability of the certificate of title, manufacturer’s certificate of origin or other relevant documentation and to the mobile home’s permanent affixation to the real property. The surrendered title and affidavit shall be recorded in the real estate records of the county clerk of the county in which the mobile home is located upon payment of the title fee under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii) and recording fees under W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(A). The affidavit form shall:

Include a complete description of the mobile home including its physical address and any data plate, tags, labels or other relevant identifying documentation;

Include a statement that the mobile home is installed on a permanent foundation and is intended by all parties to constitute, be and remain in perpetuity a fixture to the real property;

Include a statement that the mobile home is taxable as real property and not as personal property;

Contain a recital of facts and circumstances by which the affiant acquired the ownership and possession of the mobile home including why the affiant is unable to provide the clerk with the certificate of title, manufacturer’s certificate of origin or other relevant documentation;

Contain a statement that there are no known security interests, liens or encumbrances outstanding against the mobile home separate from the land;

Contain a statement that the affiant is the true and lawful owner of the mobile home.

If an affiant under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section is not the owner of the real property on which the mobile home is permanently affixed, the affiant shall file with the affidavit required under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section an acknowledgment by the owner of the real property that the mobile home is installed on a permanent foundation on the real property and is intended by the owner to constitute, be and remain in perpetuity a fixture to the real property.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1; 2017 ch. 112, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, redesignated former (b) as (b) and (b)(i), added “The county clerk shall issue a document certifying the cancellation of the certificate of title for recording in the real estate records of the county clerk of the county in which the mobile home is located” as the last sentence in (b)(i); added (b)(ii) through (c); and made related changes.

Laws 2017, ch. 112, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Mar. 2, 2017.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(iv), see § 31-2-501(a)(iv).

Cited

in

Milnes v. Milnes, 2008 WY 11, 175 P.3d 1164,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Feb. 1, 2008).

§ 31-2-503.
Applications; contents; effect.

Applications for certificates of title shall contain or be accompanied by:

The name and address of the owner, the manner in which the ownership interest in the mobile home is to be held and the person to whom the certificate of title is to be transferred;

A description of the mobile home including make, vehicle identification number, year, size and model;

If a new mobile home purchased from a mobile home dealer in any state:

The manufacturer’s certificate of origin indicating the date of sale to and the name of the first person receiving it from the manufacturer and a certification the mobile home was new when sold by the manufacturer; and

Certification by the dealer that the mobile home was new when sold to the applicant.

Certification of applicant’s ownership and any liens or encumbrances upon the mobile home;

The current title containing an assignment and warranty of title, if applicable;

Certification that all taxes due on the mobile home for the preceding and current year have been paid;

Such other information as required by the department or county clerk.

If the application for title is for a new mobile home purchased from a Wyoming mobile home dealer, the application may be signed by the Wyoming mobile home dealer, include a statement of transfer by the dealer and of any lien retained by the dealer.

If a mobile home to be titled has no vehicle identification number, the applicant shall apply for and obtain a number from the department.

Upon receipt of an application and payment of fees any county clerk shall, if satisfied that the applicant is the owner of the mobile home for which application for certificate of title is made, issue a certificate of title, upon a form approved by and provided at cost to the county clerk by the department of transportation, in the name of the owner bearing the signature and seal of the county clerk’s office. Each certificate of title shall bear a distinct serial number. The title shall be completely filled out giving a description of the mobile home in a manner prescribed by the department, indicate all encumbrances or liens on the mobile home and indicate the date of issue. Certificates of title shall contain forms for assignment of title or interest and warranty by the owner with space for notation of liens and encumbrances at the time of transfer on the reverse side and contain space for the notarization of the seller’s signature for a sale or transfer of title. Certificates of title are valid for the mobile home so long as the mobile home is owned or held by the person in whose name the title was issued. A certificate of title is prima facie proof of ownership of the mobile home for which the certificate was issued.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in the introductory language in (a), substituted “shall contain” for “shall be under oath and contain,” in (a)(i), added “the manner in which the ownership interest in the mobile home is to be held” following “owner”; and in (d), substituted “notarization of the seller's signature for a sale” for “notarization of a sale.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 194, § 2, provides: “This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020.”

§ 31-2-504.
Transfer of ownership.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the owner of a mobile home who sells or transfers his interest in a mobile home for which a certificate of title has been issued shall endorse an assignment and warranty of title upon the certificate for the mobile home with a statement of all liens and encumbrances thereon and that all taxes due thereon have been paid, which assignment, warranty and statement shall be signed and dated by the owner before a notarial officer and acknowledged thereby in the manner provided by law, to be dated and delivered to the transferee at the time of delivering the mobile home.

If the transferee is a mobile home dealer who holds the mobile home for resale and procures the certificate of title from the transferor, the dealer is not required to obtain a new certificate of title but may transfer the mobile home by an assignment and warranty of title upon the certificate of title and deliver the certificate to a subsequent transferee.

In the event of a transfer by operation of law of any interest in a mobile home as upon an order in bankruptcy or insolvency, execution sale, repossession upon default in the performance of the terms of a lease or sales contract or otherwise than by voluntary act of the person whose title or interest is transferred, the administrator, receiver, trustee, sheriff, creditor or other representative or successor in interest of the person whose interest is transferred shall forward to the county clerk an application for a certificate of title together with a verified or certified statement of the transfer of interest. The statement shall set forth the reason for the involuntary transfer, the interest transferred, the name of the transferee, the process or procedure effecting the transfer and other information requested by the county clerk. Evidence and instruments otherwise required by law to effect a transfer of legal or equitable title to or an interest in a mobile home in such cases shall be furnished with the statement. If a transfer of title to a creditor is accomplished in accordance with the provisions of this subsection, a creditor retains the right to seek any deficiency balance which may exist after sale, provided the creditor has complied with applicable law, and the transfer by itself shall not be considered a strict foreclosure or an election to retain the collateral in satisfaction of an obligation as provided by W.S. 34.1-9-620 and does not affect the debtor’s right to redeem the collateral under W.S. 34.1-9-623. If from the records of the county clerk there appears to be any lien on the mobile home which was recorded prior to the lien of the creditor applying for title and which has not been released, the certificate of title shall contain a statement of the lien. The creditor repossessing and applying for title to the mobile home shall notify all persons holding liens on the mobile home by certified mail return receipt requested at least fifteen (15) days prior to filing the application for title. Any proceeds from the sale, lease or other disposition of the mobile home shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 34.1-9-610 and 34.1-9-615.

If a mobile home is held by two (2) or more persons, any person identified as an owner on the certificate of title shall have the right to transfer all interest in the mobile home without the signature of any other owner on the title unless:

The title states the mobile home is held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship or tenancy by the entirety;

The title states the mobile home is held by co-owners in the conjunctive, by the use of the word “and” or other similar language, in which event transfer shall require the signature of each co-owner;

A transfer of all interests in the mobile home by an owner without the signature of any other owner is otherwise prohibited by law.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1; 1994, ch. 93, § 1; 1995, ch. 49, § 1; ch. 63, § 1; 2003, ch. 33, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2019 ch. 194, § 1, effective January 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c), substituted “W.S. 34.1-9-610 and 34.1-9-615” for “W.S. 34.1-9-608.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in (a).

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, in (a), substituted “signed and dated” for “subscribed.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (d).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2019, ch. 194, § 2, provides: “This act applies to certificates of title and bills of sale issued on or after January 1, 2020.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 31-2-505.
Duplicate titles.

Upon loss of a certificate of title, the owner may apply to the county clerk issuing the original title for a duplicate title. For purposes of applying for a duplicate title, “owner” means any one (1) person listed as owner on the face of the title. The applicant shall file an affidavit describing the loss with the county clerk. Upon payment of fees the county clerk shall issue a duplicate certificate of title corresponding to the original certificate and containing the following notation prominently displayed in capital letters on the face of the certificate: “THIS IS A DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE AND MAY BE SUBJECT TO THE RIGHTS OF A PERSON OR PERSONS UNDER THE ORIGINAL CERTIFICATE”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132,§ 1; 2018 ch. 37, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2022 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted the last three sentences, which read: “No duplicate certificate shall be issued before the 11th day after the affidavit is filed unless the owner deposits an indemnity bond to the state of Wyoming with the county clerk in an amount of not less than double the value of the mobile home. The bond shall be executed by a surety duly authorized to carry on business in Wyoming or by individual sureties qualified as provided by W.S.

1-1-104

and

1-1-105

. Bonds shall be conditioned for protection and indemnification of all persons who may have any interest in or dealing with the mobile home against any loss which may occur by reason of the issuance of the duplicate certificate before the 11th day after the affidavit is filed.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence.

§ 31-2-506.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 96, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1, related to fees to be collected for new or duplicate certificate of title.

§ 31-2-507.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

No person shall knowingly make any false statement in any application or other document required under this act.

No person shall sell or transfer his interest in a mobile home for which a certificate of title is required unless he has obtained a certificate and assigns his interest on the title except as otherwise provided by this act.

Any person who violates any provision of W.S.

31-2-503

through

31-2-505

and this section is guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or both. Any person who violates W.S.

31-2-508

is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 132, § 1; 1991, ch. 116, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a) and (b), see § 31-2-501(a)(iv).

§ 31-2-508.
Payment of taxes, receipt and over-width permit for transportable homes.

Before any transportable home or portion thereof, whose original movement commences within the state of Wyoming is conveyed upon any street or highway, the owner shall present a proof of ownership for each portion of a prebuilt or modular home, or a certificate of title or copy of the certificate of title if for a mobile home, to the county treasurer of the county in which the transportable home is located, and pay the current year’s taxes as computed by the county treasurer. If a copy of the certificate of title is presented, the county treasurer shall verify that the copy is a true and accurate copy of the current title issued for the mobile home. In the event the ad valorem levy has not been set for the current year, the current year’s tax shall be computed upon the levy for the previous year. Upon full payment of the current year’s taxes due, the county treasurer shall issue a receipt describing the transportable home, indicating that a copy of the certificate of title was verified if applicable and indicating the current year’s taxes are paid. Upon presentation of the receipt to the director of the department of transportation, or his authorized representative, the owner may be issued an over-width permit. Payment of the taxes due on a transportable home is not required for the issuance of an over-width permit if the transportable home is abandoned and is moved pursuant to W.S.

31-13-101

through

31-13-116

. As used in this section, “transportable home” means as defined in W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxiv).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 97, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 31-16.1; Laws 1975, ch. 77, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 31-4-106,

39-2-305

; Laws 1984, ch. 47, § 2; 1985, ch. 132, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1991; ch. 241, § 3; 2019 ch. 188, § 1, effective March 8, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

added “or copy of the certificate of title” following “certificate of title” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and added “indicating that a copy of the certificate of title was verified if applicable” following “transportable home” in the fourth sentence.

Laws 2019, ch. 188, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.